Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-727
Management area; contamination; action plan; contents.

An action plan filed by a district pursuant to section 46-726 shall include the specifics of an educational program to be instituted by the district to inform persons of methods available to stabilize or reduce the level or prevent the increase or spread of ground water contamination. The action plan shall include one or more of the controls authorized by section 46-739.

Laws 1986, LB 894, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 51, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-674.09;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 47;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.41;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 67.